Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.170

Rules and regulations.

The director is authorized and shall make and enforce such regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter. Such regulations shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1949 c 100 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-21.]